test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-kuernec_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - kueʹrnec e-stem kamari: # Noun "kamari" - full paradigm
     kueʹrnec+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: kueʹrnec
     kueʹrnec+N+Sg+Gen+Indef: kueʹrnec
     kueʹrnec+N+Sg+Acc+Indef: kueʹrnec
     kueʹrnec+N+Sg+Ill+Indef: kueʹrnca
     kueʹrnec+N+Sg+Loc+Indef: kueʹrncest
     kueʹrnec+N+Sg+Com+Indef: kueʹrncin
     kueʹrnec+N+Ess+Indef: kueʹrncen
     kueʹrnec+N+Par+Indef: kueʹrnced
     kueʹrnec+N+Sg+Abe+Indef: [kueʹrnectaa, kueʹrnectää]
     kueʹrnec+N+Pl+Nom+Indef: kueʹrnec
     kueʹrnec+N+Pl+Gen+Indef: kueʹrnci
     kueʹrnec+N+Pl+Acc+Indef: kueʹrncid
     kueʹrnec+N+Pl+Ill+Indef: kueʹrncid
     kueʹrnec+N+Pl+Loc+Indef: kueʹrncin
     kueʹrnec+N+Pl+Com+Indef: kueʹrncivuiʹm
     kueʹrnec+N+Pl+Abe+Indef: [kueʹrncitaa, kueʹrncitää]
